Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1032.
do enact as follows:AB1032,1Section 1. 23.15 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:23.15 (1m) Notwithstanding sub. (1), the natural resources board may sell lands that are owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the department of natural resources and that are adjacent to or within one mile of a commercial egg farm to prevent the spread of avian flu. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1032 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1032 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1032 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1032 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB1032: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting